Utah statutes.
35A-4-401.   Benefits -- Weekly benefit amount -- Computation of benefits --
Department to prescribe rules -- Notification of benefits -- Bonuses.
(1) (a)  Benefits are payable from the fund to an individual who is or becomes
unemployed and eligible for benefits.
(b)  All benefits shall be paid through the employment offices or other
agencies designated by the division in accordance with rules the department
may prescribe in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act.
(2) (a)  An individual's "weekly benefit amount" is an amount equal to 1/26th,
disregarding any fraction of $1, of the individual's total wages for insured
work paid during that quarter of the base period in which the total wages were
highest.
(b)  The weekly benefit amount may not exceed the amount determined as
follows:
(i)  With respect to an individual whose benefit year commences on or after
January 1, 2001, 65% of the "insured average fiscal year weekly wage" during
the preceding fiscal year, e.g., fiscal year 2000 for individuals establishing
benefit years in 2001, disregarding any fraction of $1, constitutes the
maximum "weekly benefit amount" payable.
(ii)  With respect to an individual who files a claim for benefits on or after
July 4, 2004, 62.5% of the insured average fiscal year weekly wage during the
preceding fiscal year, disregarding any fraction of $1, constitutes the
maximum weekly benefit amount payable.
(c) (i)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2)(c)(ii), the "weekly
benefit amount" of an individual who is receiving, or who is eligible to
receive, based upon the individual's previous employment, a pension, which
includes a governmental, social security, or other pension, retirement or
disability retirement pay, under a plan maintained or contributed to by a
base-period employer is the "weekly benefit amount" which is computed under
this section less 100% of the retirement benefits, that are attributable to a
week, disregarding any fraction of $1.
(ii)  With respect to an individual whose benefit year begins after July 1,
2004, and ends on or before July 1, 2011, the "weekly benefit amount" of that
individual, who is receiving or who is eligible to receive Social Security
benefits based upon the individual's previous employment, is the "weekly
benefit amount" which is computed under this section less 50% of the
individual's Social Security benefits that are attributable to the week, but
not below zero.
(d) (i) (A)  The weekly benefit amount and the potential benefits payable to
an individual who, subsequent to the commencement of the individual's benefit
year, becomes or is determined to be eligible to receive retirement benefits
or increased retirement benefits, shall be recomputed effective with the first
calendar week during the individual's benefit year with respect to which the
individual is eligible to receive retirement benefits or increased retirement
benefits.
(B)  The new weekly benefit amount shall be determined under this Subsection
(2).
(ii)  As recomputed the total benefits potentially payable, commencing with
the effective date of the recomputation, shall be equal to the recomputed
weekly benefit amount times the quotient obtained by dividing the potential
benefits unpaid prior to the recomputation by the initial weekly benefit
amount, disregarding fractions.
(3) (a)  An eligible individual who is unemployed in any week shall be paid
with respect to that week a benefit in an amount equal to the individual's
weekly benefit amount less that part of the individual's wage payable to the
individual with respect to that week that is in excess of 30% of the
individual's weekly benefit amount.
(b)  The resulting benefit payable shall disregard any fraction of $1.
(c)  For the purpose of this Subsection (3) "wages" does not include a grant
paid to the   individual as public assistance.
(4) (a)  An otherwise eligible individual is entitled during a benefit year to
a total amount of benefits determined by multiplying the individual's weekly
benefit amount times the individual's potential duration.
(b)  To determine an individual's potential duration, the individual's total
wages for insured work paid during the base period is multiplied by 27%,
disregarding any fraction of $1, and divided by the individual's weekly
benefit amount, disregarding any fraction, but not less than 10 nor more than
26.
(5) (a)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act, the department may by rule prescribe:
(i)  that the existence of unemployment, eligibility for benefits, and the
amount of benefits payable shall be determined in the case of an otherwise
eligible individual who, within a week or other period of unemployment, is
separated from or secures work on a regular attachment basis for that portion
of the week or other period of unemployment occurring before or after
separation from or securing of work; and
(ii)  in the case of an individual working on a regular attachment basis,
eligibility for benefits and the amount of benefits payable for periods of
unemployment longer than a week.
(b)  The rules made shall be reasonably calculated to secure general results
substantially similar to those provided by this chapter with respect to weeks
of unemployment.
(6)  The division shall, in all cases involving actual or potential
disqualifying issues and prior to the payment of benefits to an eligible
individual, notify the individual's most recent employer of the eligibility
determination.
(7)  Upon written request of an individual made under rules of the department
in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act,
all remuneration for insured work paid to the individual during the
individual's period in the form of a bonus or lump-sum payment shall, for
benefit purposes, be apportioned to the calendar quarters in which the
remuneration was earned.
